Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-8] Restitution. Any person who
engages in an act or practice that violates any provision of this chapter or
rules adopted pursuant hereto may be ordered by a court of proper jurisdiction
to make restitution to all persons injured by the act or practice. [L 1991, c
285, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next